Washington statutes.
RCW 35.81.130

Powers of public bodies.

For the purpose of aiding in the planning, undertaking, or carrying out of a community renewal project located within the area in which it is authorized to act, any public body authorized by law or by this chapter, may, upon such terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine: (1) Dedicate, sell, convey, or lease any of its interest in any property, or grant easements, licenses, or other rights or privileges therein to a municipality or other public body; (2) incur the entire expense of any public improvements made by a public body, in exercising the powers granted in this section; (3) do any and all things necessary to aid or cooperate in the planning or carrying out of a community renewal plan; (4) lend, grant, or contribute funds, including without limitation any funds derived from bonds issued or other borrowings authorized in this chapter, to a municipality or other public body and, subject only to any applicable constitutional limits, to any other person; (5) enter into agreements (which may extend over any period, notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary) with a municipality or other public body respecting action to be taken pursuant to any of the powers granted by this chapter, including the furnishing of funds or other assistance in connection with a community renewal project; (6) cause public building and public facilities, including parks, playgrounds, recreational, community, educational, water, sewer, or drainage facilities, or any other works that it is otherwise empowered to undertake to be furnished; furnish, dedicate, close, vacate, pave, install, grade, regrade, plan, or replan streets, roads, sidewalks, ways, or other places; (7) abate environmental problems; (8) plan or replan, zone or rezone any part of the community renewal area; and (9) provide such administrative and other services as may be deemed requisite to the efficient exercise of the powers herein granted.

[ 2002 c 218 s 16; 1965 c 7 s 35.81.130. Prior: 1957 c 42 s 13.]

NOTES:

Severability—Savings—Construction—2002 c 218: See notes following RCW 35.81.005.

Demonstration Cities and Metropolitan Development Act—Authority to contract with federal government: RCW 35.21.660.